Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-107.1 Rating and advisory
organizations, permitted activity. In addition to other activities not
expressly prohibited by this article, rating organizations and advisory
organizations are authorized, on behalf of their members and subscribers, to:

(1) Develop statistical plans including territorial
and class definitions;

(2) Collect statistical data from members,
subscribers, or any other source;

(3) Prepare and distribute prospective loss costs;

(4) Prepare and distribute factors, calculations or
formulas pertaining to classification, territory, increased limits, and other
variables;

(5) Prepare and distribute manuals of rating rules
and rating schedules that do not include final rates, expenses provisions,
profit provisions, or minimum premiums;

(6) Distribute information that is required or
directed to be filed with the commissioner;

(7) Conduct research and on-site inspections in order
to prepare classifications of public fire defenses;

(8) Consult with public officials regarding public fire
protection as it would affect members, subscribers, and others;

(9) Conduct research and collect statistics in order
to discover, identify, and classify information relating to causes or
prevention of losses;

(10) Prepare policy forms and endorsements and consult
with members, subscribers, and others relative to their use and application;

(11) Conduct research and on-site inspections for the
purpose of providing risk information relating to individual structures;

(12) Collect, compile, and distribute past and current
prices of individual insurers and publish that information;

(13) File final rates, at the direction of the
commissioner, for residual market mechanisms; and

(14) Furnish any other services, as approved or
directed by the commissioner, related to those enumerated in this section. [L
1990, c 255, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next